North Carolina, session 2025, SB543.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 147-64.6(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) Responsibilities. – The Auditor is responsible for the following acts and activities:
…
(24) The Auditor shall periodically audit nonpublic schools that enroll students
who receive scholarship grants under Part 2A of Article 39 of Chapter 115C
of the General Statutes."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S543-v-1*